dev/verbs/tgl.twol
Alphabet 

  p t k a e i o u m n h b

  E:a E:i E:o E:u E:e
  R:p R:b R:t R:k

  @P.ACT3.ON@  @P.ACT1.ON@
  %+:0 %> %^UM ;

Sets

  Cons = p t k b ; 
  Vow = a e i o u ;
  Nas = m n ;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundries"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

! bili>in --> bilhin
"Replace final 'i' with 'h' before suffixes beginning with 'i'" 
i:h <=> _ %>:0 i ;

! man>bili --> mambili
"Nasal assimilation"
n:m <=> _ %>:0 @P.ACT3.ON@ b ; 

! mambili --> mamili
!"Nasal deletion"
!b:0 <=> m _ @P.ACT3.ON@ ;

! %^UM>bili --> bumili
!"Infix insertion"
!%^UM:0 <=> %>:0 _ @P.ACT1.ON@ ; 

"R realisation as Consonant"
R:CC <=> _ E: %+: CC ; where CC in Cons ;

"E realisation as Vowel"
E:VV <=> _ %+: (Cons:) VV ; where VV in Vow ;
